Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-507
State Treasurer; Auditor of Public Accounts; Secretary of State; Attorney General; terms; qualifications; partisan ballot.

The State Treasurer, Auditor of Public Accounts, Secretary of State, and Attorney General shall be elected at the statewide general election in 1994 and each four years thereafter. Such officers shall serve for terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified. Candidates for State Treasurer shall meet the qualifications found in Article IV, section 3, of the Constitution of Nebraska. Such officers shall be elected on the partisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 103.